Vermont, session 2025-2026, H843.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 1263 is amended to read:
§ 1263. DISCHARGE PERMITS
(a) Any person who intends to discharge waste into the waters of the State
or who intends to discharge into an injection well or who intends to discharge
into any publicly owned treatment works any waste that interferes with, passes
through without treatment, or is otherwise incompatible with that works or
would have a substantial adverse effect on that works or on water quality, or is
required to apply for a CAFO permit, shall make application to the Secretary
for a discharge permit. Application shall be made on a form prescribed by the
VT LEG #385969 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.843
2026 Page 2 of 3
Secretary. An applicant shall pay an application fee in accordance with
3 V.S.A. § 2822.
* * *
(d) A discharge permit shall:
(1) Specify the manner, nature, volume, and frequency of the discharge
permitted and contain terms and conditions consistent with subsection (c) of
this section.
(2) Require proper operation and maintenance of any pollution
abatement facility necessary in the treatment or processing of the waste by
qualified personnel in accordance with standards established by the Secretary
and the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation. The Secretary may
require that a pollution abatement facility be operated by persons licensed
under 26 V.S.A. chapter 99 and may prescribe the class of license required.
The Secretary may require a laboratory quality assurance sample program to
ensure qualifications of laboratory analysts. As used in this subsection,
“pollution abatement facility” has the same meaning as “water pollution
abatement and control facility” under section 1571 of this title.
(3) Contain an operation, management, and emergency response plan
when required under section 1278 of this title and additional conditions,
requirements, and restrictions as the Secretary deems necessary to preserve and
protect the quality of the receiving waters, including requirements concerning
VT LEG #385969 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.843
2026 Page 3 of 3
recording, reporting, monitoring, and inspection of the operation and
maintenance of waste treatment facilities and waste collection systems. A
discharge permit for a pollution abatement facility shall include requirements
for the monitoring of the discharge from the facility, including monitoring
requirements for pesticides and pharmaceuticals. Annually, on or before
January 15, the Secretary shall develop a list of the pesticides and
pharmaceuticals most commonly used in the State in the preceding calendar
year. Upon completion of the lists, the Secretary shall require pollution
abatement facilities in the State to monitor for the top 80 percent of pesticides
used in the State and the top 80 percent of pharmaceuticals used in the State.
(4) Be valid for the period of time specified therein, not to exceed five
years.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385969 v.1